Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-369.04
Civil penalty; order; contents; collection.

Any order issued by the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety under section 75-369.03 shall include at least (1) the date of the order, (2) a description of each act or omission upon which the violation is based, (3) the manner in which and the place where the respondent may pay the civil penalty or request a hearing within fifteen business days after receipt of the order, and (4) a notice that if the respondent fails to respond to the order within fifteen business days after receipt of the order, the order shall automatically become final and the civil penalty may be collected by civil action in the district court of Lancaster County.

Laws 1994, LB 358, § 4.